Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 29-4301 to 29-4304:

(1) Advocate means any employee or supervised volunteer of a domestic violence and sexual assault victim assistance program or of any other agency, business, or organization that is not affiliated with a law enforcement or prosecutor's office, whose primary purpose is assisting domestic violence and sexual assault victims;

(2) Victim means a person who communicates with an advocate for assistance in overcoming the adverse effects of domestic violence or sexual assault; and

(3) Confidential communication means any written or spoken information exchanged between a victim and an advocate in private or in the presence of a third party who is necessary to facilitate communication or further the advocacy process and which is disclosed to the advocate for the purposes of overcoming the adverse effects of domestic violence or sexual assault.

Laws 2004, LB 613, § 2.